Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 16. Psychiatric Treatment of Minors Act.
§ 16.1-340.
Emergency custody; issuance and execution of order.

Any magistrate shall issue, upon the sworn petition of a minor’s treating physician or parent or, if the parent is not available or is unable or unwilling to file a petition, by any responsible adult, including the person having custody over a minor in detention or shelter care pursuant to an order of a juvenile and domestic relations district court, or upon his own motion, an emergency custody order when he has probable cause to believe that (i) because of mental illness, the minor (a) presents a serious danger to himself or others to the extent that severe or irremediable injury is likely to result, as evidenced by recent acts or threats, or (b) is experiencing a serious deterioration of his ability to care for himself in a developmentally age-appropriate manner, as evidenced by delusionary thinking or by a significant impairment of functioning in hydration, nutrition, self-protection, or self-control; and (ii) the minor is in need of compulsory treatment for a mental illness and is reasonably likely to benefit from the proposed treatment. Any emergency custody order entered pursuant to this section shall provide for the disclosure of medical records pursuant to subsection B of §

16.1-337

. This subsection shall not preclude any other disclosures as required or permitted by law. To the extent possible, the petition shall contain the information required by §

16.1-339.1

.When considering whether there is probable cause to issue an emergency custody order, the magistrate may, in addition to the petition, consider (1) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician or psychologist licensed in Virginia, if available, (2) any past actions of the minor, (3) any past mental health treatment of the minor, (4) any relevant hearsay evidence, (5) any medical records available, (6) any affidavits submitted, if the witness is unavailable and it so states in the affidavit, and (7) any other information available that the magistrate considers relevant to the determination of whether probable cause exists to issue an emergency custody order.

Any minor for whom an emergency custody order is issued shall be taken into custody and transported to a convenient location to be evaluated to determine whether he meets the criteria for temporary detention pursuant to §

16.1-340.1

and to assess the need for hospitalization or treatment. The evaluation shall be made by a person designated by the community services board serving the area in which the minor is located who is skilled in the diagnosis and treatment of mental illness and who has completed a certification program approved by the Department.

The magistrate issuing an emergency custody order shall specify the primary law-enforcement agency and jurisdiction to execute the emergency custody order and provide transportation. However, the magistrate may authorize transportation by an alternative transportation provider, including a parent, family member, or friend of the minor who is the subject of the order, a representative of the community services board, or other transportation provider with personnel trained to provide transportation in a safe manner, upon determining, following consideration of information provided by the petitioner; the community services board or its designee; the local law-enforcement agency, if any; the minor’s treating physician, if any; or other persons who are available and have knowledge of the minor, and, when the magistrate deems appropriate, the proposed alternative transportation provider, either in person or via two-way electronic video and audio or telephone communication system, that the proposed alternative transportation provider is available to provide transportation, willing to provide transportation, and able to provide transportation in a safe manner. When transportation is ordered to be provided by an alternative transportation provider, the magistrate shall order the specified primary law-enforcement agency to execute the order, to take the minor into custody, and to transfer custody of the minor to the alternative transportation provider identified in the order. In such cases, a copy of the emergency custody order shall accompany the minor being transported pursuant to this section at all times and shall be delivered by the alternative transportation provider to the community services board or its designee responsible for conducting the evaluation. The community services board or its designee conducting the evaluation shall return a copy of the emergency custody order to the court designated by the magistrate as soon as is practicable. Delivery of an order to a law-enforcement officer or alternative transportation provider and return of an order to the court may be accomplished electronically or by facsimile.Transportation under this section shall include transportation to a medical facility as may be necessary to obtain emergency medical evaluation or treatment that shall be conducted immediately in accordance with state and federal law. Transportation under this section shall include transportation to a medical facility for a medical evaluation if a physician at the hospital in which the minor subject to the emergency custody order may be detained requires a medical evaluation prior to admission.

In specifying the primary law-enforcement agency and jurisdiction for purposes of this section, the magistrate shall order the primary law-enforcement agency from the jurisdiction served by the community services board that designated the person to perform the evaluation required in subsection B to execute the order and, in cases in which transportation is ordered to be provided by the primary law-enforcement agency, provide transportation. If the community services board serves more than one jurisdiction, the magistrate shall designate the primary law-enforcement agency from the particular jurisdiction within the community services board’s service area where the minor who is the subject of the emergency custody order was taken into custody or, if the minor has not yet been taken into custody, the primary law-enforcement agency from the jurisdiction where the minor is presently located to execute the order and provide transportation.

The law-enforcement agency or alternative transportation provider providing transportation pursuant to this section may transfer custody of the minor to the facility or location to which the minor is transported for the evaluation required in subsection B, G, or H if the facility or location (i) is licensed to provide the level of security necessary to protect both the minor and others from harm, (ii) is actually capable of providing the level of security necessary to protect the minor and others from harm, and (iii) in cases in which transportation is provided by a law-enforcement agency, has entered into an agreement or memorandum of understanding with the law-enforcement agency setting forth the terms and conditions under which it will accept a transfer of custody, provided, however, that the facility or location may not require the law-enforcement agency to pay any fees or costs for the transfer of custody.

A law-enforcement officer may lawfully go or be sent beyond the territorial limits of the county, city, or town in which he serves to any point in the Commonwealth for the purpose of executing an emergency custody order pursuant to this section.

A law-enforcement officer who, based upon his observation or the reliable reports of others, has probable cause to believe that a minor meets the criteria for emergency custody as stated in this section may take that minor into custody and transport that minor to an appropriate location to assess the need for hospitalization or treatment without prior authorization. A law-enforcement officer who takes a person into custody pursuant to this subsection or subsection H may lawfully go or be sent beyond the territorial limits of the county, city, or town in which he serves to any point in the Commonwealth for the purpose of obtaining the assessment. Such evaluation shall be conducted immediately. The period of custody shall not exceed eight hours from the time the law-enforcement officer takes the minor into custody.

A law-enforcement officer who is transporting a minor who has voluntarily consented to be transported to a facility for the purpose of assessment or evaluation and who is beyond the territorial limits of the county, city, or town in which he serves may take such minor into custody and transport him to an appropriate location to assess the need for hospitalization or treatment without prior authorization when the law-enforcement officer determines (i) that the minor has revoked consent to be transported to a facility for the purpose of assessment or evaluation and (ii) based upon his observations, that probable cause exists to believe that the minor meets the criteria for emergency custody as stated in this section. The period of custody shall not exceed eight hours from the time the law-enforcement officer takes the minor into custody.

A representative of the primary law-enforcement agency specified to execute an emergency custody order or a representative of the law-enforcement agency employing a law-enforcement officer who takes a person into custody pursuant to subsection G or H shall notify the community services board responsible for conducting the evaluation required in subsection B, G, or H as soon as practicable after execution of the emergency custody order or after the person has been taken into custody pursuant to subsection G or H.

Nothing herein shall preclude a law-enforcement officer or alternative transportation provider from obtaining emergency medical treatment or further medical evaluation at any time for a minor in his custody as provided in this section.

The minor shall remain in custody until a temporary detention order is issued, until the minor is released, or until the emergency custody order expires. An emergency custody order shall be valid for a period not to exceed eight hours from the time of execution.

If an emergency custody order is not executed within eight hours of its issuance, the order shall be void and shall be returned unexecuted to the office of the clerk of the issuing court or, if such office is not open, to any magistrate serving the jurisdiction of the issuing court.

In addition to the eight-hour period of emergency custody set forth in subsection G, H, or K, if the minor is detained in a state facility pursuant to subsection D of §

16.1-340.1

, the state facility and an employee or designee of the community services board may, for an additional four hours, continue to attempt to identify an alternative facility that is able and willing to provide temporary detention and appropriate care to the minor.

Payments shall be made pursuant to §

37.2-804

to licensed health care providers for medical screening and assessment services provided to minors with mental illnesses while in emergency custody.

No person who provides alternative transportation pursuant to this section shall be liable to the person being transported for any civil damages for ordinary negligence in acts or omissions that result from providing such alternative transportation.

History.

1990, c. 975; 1991, c. 159; 1992, c. 884; 2000, cc. 65, 246; 2001, c. 837; 2004, c. 283; 2005, c. 346; 2006, c. 401; 2008, cc. 783, 808; 2009, cc. 455, 555; 2010, cc. 778, 825; 2011, c. 249; 2014, cc. 691, 761; 2015, cc. 297, 308; 2018, c. 570.

Editor’s note.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2014, c. 691, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of this act adding subsection M to §

16.1-340

and subsection N to §

37.2-808

[now subsection O] of the Code of Virginia shall expire on June 30, 2018.”
Subsection M expired, however, Acts 2018, c. 570 enacted an identical subsection M.

Acts 2014, c. 691, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall submit an annual report on or before June 30 of each year on the implementation of this act to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees. The report shall include the number of notifications of individuals in need of facility services by the community services boards, the number of alternative facilities contacted by community services boards and state facilities, the number of temporary detentions provided by state facilities and alternative facilities, the length of stay in state facilities and alternative facilities, and the cost of the detentions in state facilities and alternative facilities.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by c. 65 and 246 are identical, and substituted “§ 37.1-67.01 or § 37.1-67.1” for “§ 37.1-67.1” in the first sentence.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 837, in the last sentence, deleted “or other” preceding “legal holiday,” inserted “or day on which the court is lawfully closed,” preceding “the seventy-two hours,” deleted “or” preceding “legal holiday,” inserted “or day on which the court is lawfully closed” following “legal holiday” and deleted the last sentence, which read, “In no case may the time period between the filing of the petition and the hearing under §

16.1-344

exceed ninety-six hours.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 283 twice inserted “serving the jurisdiction in which the minor is located or resides”; substituted “24” for “twenty-four” in the third sentence; substituted “72” for “seventy-two” throughout the section; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 346, in the first sentence, inserted “including a minor in detention or shelter care pursuant to an order of a juvenile and domestic relations court” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 401 deleted “or resides” following “located” in the second and third sentences.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 783 and 808 are identical, and twice substituted “96 hours” for “72 hours,” inserted “or filing of the petition pursuant to §

16.1-341

, whichever occurs later” in the third sentence, and substituted “96-hour period” for “72-hour period” in the fourth sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 455 and 555 are identical, and inserted “except that an emergency custody order pursuant to §

37.2-808

or a temporary detention order pursuant to §

37.2-809

shall only be issued for a minor if the minor meets the criteria for involuntary commitment set forth in §

16.1-345

” in the first sentence.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendments by cc. 778 and 825 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 249 substituted “six hours” for “four hours” in subsection K.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 691 and 761 substituted “eight hours” for “four hours” in the last sentences of subsections G, H, and K; deleted the former last two sentences of subsection G, which read “However, upon a finding by a magistrate that good cause exists to grant an extension, the magistrate shall issue an order extending the period of emergency custody one time for an additional period not to exceed two hours. Good cause for an extension includes the need for additional time to allow (i) the community services board to identify a suitable facility in which the minor can be temporarily detained pursuant to §

16.1-340.1

or (ii) a medical evaluation of the person to be completed if necessary”; deleted the former last two sentences of subsection H, which were nearly identical to the sentences deleted in subsection G; deleted the former last three sentences of subsection K, which read “However, upon a finding by a magistrate that good cause exists to grant an extension, the magistrate shall extend the emergency custody order one time for a second period not to exceed two hours. Good cause for an extension includes the need for additional time to allow (i) the community services board to identify a suitable facility in which the minor can be temporarily detained pursuant to §

16.1-340.1

or (ii) a medical evaluation of the person to be completed if necessary. Any family member, as defined in §

37.2-100

, employee or designee of the community services board, treating physician, or law-enforcement officer may request the two-hour extension”; added subsection I and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and in subsection L substituted “eight hours” for “six hours.”
Chapter 691 also added subsection M.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 297 and 308 are identical, and in the second sentence in subsection C, deleted “in cases in which the emergency custody order is based upon a finding that the minor who is the subject of the order has a mental illness and that, as a result of mental illness, the minor is experiencing a serious deterioration of his ability to care for himself in a developmentally age-appropriate manner, as evidenced by delusionary thinking or by a significant impairment of functioning in hydration, nutrition, self-protection, or self-control,” following “However” and added subsection O.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 570 added subsection M.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Family and Juvenile Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 151 (2006).

§ 16.1-340.1.
Involuntary temporary detention; issuance and execution of order.

A magistrate shall issue, upon the sworn petition of a minor’s treating physician or parent or, if the parent is not available or is unable or unwilling to file a petition, by any responsible adult, including the person having custody over a minor in detention or shelter care pursuant to an order of a juvenile and domestic relations district court, or upon his own motion and only after an evaluation conducted in-person or by means of a two-way electronic video and audio communication system as authorized in §

16.1-345.1

by an employee or designee of the local community services board to determine whether the minor meets the criteria for temporary detention, a temporary detention order if it appears from all evidence readily available, including any recommendation from a physician, clinical psychologist, clinical social worker, or licensed professional counselor treating the person, that (i) because of mental illness, the minor (a) presents a serious danger to himself or others to the extent that severe or irremediable injury is likely to result, as evidenced by recent acts or threats, or (b) is experiencing a serious deterioration of his ability to care for himself in a developmentally age-appropriate manner, as evidenced by delusionary thinking or by a significant impairment of functioning in hydration, nutrition, self-protection, or self-control; and (ii) the minor is in need of compulsory treatment for a mental illness and is reasonably likely to benefit from the proposed treatment. The magistrate shall also consider the recommendations of the minor’s parents and of any treating or examining physician licensed in Virginia if available either verbally or in writing prior to rendering a decision. To the extent possible, the petition shall contain the information required by §

16.1-339.1

. Any temporary detention order entered pursuant to this section shall be effective until such time as the juvenile and domestic relations district court serving the jurisdiction in which the minor is located conducts a hearing pursuant to subsection B of §

16.1-341

. Any temporary detention order entered pursuant to this section shall provide for the disclosure of medical records pursuant to subsection B of §

16.1-337

. This subsection shall not preclude any other disclosures as required or permitted by law.

When considering whether there is probable cause to issue a temporary detention order, the magistrate may, in addition to the petition, consider (i) the recommendations of any treating or examining physician, psychologist, clinical social worker, or licensed professional counselor licensed in Virginia, if available, (ii) any past actions of the minor, (iii) any past mental health treatment of the minor, (iv) any relevant hearsay evidence, (v) any medical records available, (vi) any affidavits submitted, if the witness is unavailable and it so states in the affidavit, and (vii) any other information available that the magistrate considers relevant to the determination of whether probable cause exists to issue a temporary detention order.

A magistrate may issue a temporary detention order without an emergency custody order proceeding. A magistrate may issue a temporary detention order without a prior evaluation pursuant to subsection A if (i) the minor has been personally examined within the previous 72 hours by an employee or designee of the local community services board or (ii) there is a significant physical, psychological, or medical risk to the minor or to others associated with conducting such evaluation.

An employee or designee of the local community services board shall determine the facility of temporary detention in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-340

.1:1 for all minors detained pursuant to this section. An employee or designee of the local community services board may change the facility of temporary detention and may designate an alternative facility for temporary detention at any point during the period of temporary detention if it is determined that the alternative facility is a more appropriate facility for temporary detention of the minor given the specific security, medical, or behavioral health needs of the minor. In cases in which the facility of temporary detention is changed following transfer of custody to an initial facility of temporary detention, transportation of the minor to the alternative facility of temporary detention shall be provided in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-340

.2. The initial facility of temporary detention shall be identified on the preadmission screening report and indicated on the temporary detention order; however, if an employee or designee of the local community services board designates an alternative facility, that employee or designee shall provide written notice forthwith, on a form developed by the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, to the clerk of the issuing court of the name and address of the alternative facility. Subject to the provisions of §

16.1-340.1:1

, if a facility of temporary detention cannot be identified by the time of the expiration of the period of emergency custody pursuant to § 16.1-340, the minor shall be detained in a state facility for the treatment of minors with mental illness and such facility shall be indicated on the temporary detention order. Except for minors who are detained for a criminal offense by a juvenile and domestic relations district court and who require hospitalization in accordance with this article, the minor shall not be detained in a jail or other place of confinement for persons charged with criminal offenses and shall remain in the custody of law enforcement until the minor is either detained within a secure facility or custody has been accepted by the appropriate personnel designated by either the initial facility of temporary detention identified in the temporary detention order or by the alternative facility of temporary detention designated by the employee or designee of the local community services board pursuant to this subsection.

Any facility caring for a minor placed with it pursuant to a temporary detention order is authorized to provide emergency medical and psychiatric services within its capabilities when the facility determines that the services are in the best interests of the minor within its care. The costs incurred as a result of the hearings and by the facility in providing services during the period of temporary detention shall be paid and recovered pursuant to §

37.2-804

. The maximum costs reimbursable by the Commonwealth pursuant to this section shall be established by the State Board of Medical Assistance Services based on reasonable criteria. The State Board of Medical Assistance Services shall, by regulation, establish a reasonable rate per day of inpatient care for temporary detention.

The employee or designee of the local community services board who is conducting the evaluation pursuant to this section shall determine, prior to the issuance of the temporary detention order, the insurance status of the minor. Where coverage by a third party payor exists, the facility seeking reimbursement under this section shall first seek reimbursement from the third party payor. The Commonwealth shall reimburse the facility only for the balance of costs remaining after the allowances covered by the third party payor have been received.

The duration of temporary detention shall be sufficient to allow for completion of the examination required by §

16.1-342

, preparation of the preadmission screening report required by §

16.1-340.4

, and initiation of mental health treatment to stabilize the minor’s psychiatric condition to avoid involuntary commitment where possible, but shall not exceed 96 hours prior to a hearing. If the 96-hour period herein specified terminates on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the minor may be detained, as herein provided, until the close of business on the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. The minor may be released, pursuant to §

16.1-340.3

, before the 96-hour period herein specified has run.

If a temporary detention order is not executed within 24 hours of its issuance, or within a shorter period as is specified in the order, the order shall be void and shall be returned unexecuted to the office of the clerk of the issuing court or, if the office is not open, to any magistrate serving the jurisdiction of the issuing court. Subsequent orders may be issued upon the original petition within 96 hours after the petition is filed. However, a magistrate must again obtain the advice of an employee or designee of the local community services board prior to issuing a subsequent order upon the original petition. Any petition for which no temporary detention order or other process in connection therewith is served on the subject of the petition within 96 hours after the petition is filed shall be void and shall be returned to the office of the clerk of the issuing court.

For purposes of this section, a health care provider or an employee or designee of the local community services board shall not be required to encrypt any email containing information or medical records provided to a magistrate unless there is reason to believe that a third party will attempt to intercept the email.

The employee or designee of the local community services board who is conducting the evaluation pursuant to this section shall, if he recommends that the minor should not be subject to a temporary detention order, inform the petitioner and an on-site treating physician of his recommendation.

Each community services board shall provide to each juvenile and domestic relations district court and magistrate’s office within its service area a list of employees and designees who are available to perform the evaluations required herein.

History.

2010, cc. 778, 825; 2014, cc. 691, 773; 2018, c. 20; 2020, c. 945; 2022, c. 509.

Cross references.

As to temporary detention orders as evidence in judicial proceedings, see §

8.01-389

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 691, cl. 4 and c. 773, cl. 2 provide: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall submit an annual report on or before June 30 of each year on the implementation of this act to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees. The report shall include the number of notifications of individuals in need of facility services by the community services boards, the number of alternative facilities contacted by community services boards and state facilities, the number of temporary detentions provided by state facilities and alternative facilities, the length of stay in state facilities and alternative facilities, and the cost of the detentions in state facilities and alternative facilities.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 691 and 773 are identical, and in subsection D inserted “in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-340.1:1

” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence, which read “The facility of temporary detention shall be one that has been approved pursuant to regulations of the Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services,” and added the third sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 20, in subsection D, inserted “local” in the first sentence, inserted the second and third sentences, substituted “The initial facility of temporary detention” for “The facility” and added “however, if an employee . . .” to the end of the fourth sentence, and substituted “designated by either the initial facility of temporary detention” for “designated by the facility” and inserted “or by the alternative facility of temporary detention designated by the employee or designee of the local community services board pursuant to this subsection” in the last sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 945 inserted “or clinical social worker” in subsections A and B and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 509, substituted “clinical psychologist, clinical social worker, or licensed professional counselor” for “clinical psychologist, or clinical social worker” in the first sentence of subsection A; substituted “psychologist, clinical social worker, or licensed professional counselor” for “psychologist, or clinical social worker” in subsection B; and substituted “health care” for “healthcare” in subsection I.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

7A M.J. Evidence, § 84.

§ 16.1-340.1:1.
Facility of temporary detention.

In each case in which an employee or designee of the local community services board is required to make an evaluation of a minor pursuant to subsection B, G, or H of §

16.1-340

, an employee or designee of the local community services board shall, upon being notified of the need for such evaluation, contact the state facility for the area in which the community services board is located and notify the state facility that the minor will be transported to the facility upon issuance of a temporary detention order if no other facility of temporary detention can be identified by the time of the expiration of the period of emergency custody pursuant to §

16.1-340

. Upon completion of the evaluation, the employee or designee of the local community services board shall convey to the state facility information about the minor necessary to allow the state facility to determine the services the minor will require upon admission.

A state facility may, following the notice in accordance with subsection A, conduct a search for an alternative facility that is able and willing to provide temporary detention and appropriate care to the minor, which may include another state facility if the state facility notified in accordance with subsection A is unable to provide temporary detention and appropriate care for the minor. Under no circumstances shall a state facility fail or refuse to admit a minor who meets the criteria for temporary detention pursuant to §

16.1-340.1

unless an alternative facility that is able to provide temporary detention and appropriate care agrees to accept the minor for temporary detention, and the minor shall not during the duration of the temporary detention order be released from custody except for purposes of transporting the minor to the state facility or alternative facility in accordance with the provisions of §

16.1-340.2

. If an alternative facility is identified and agrees to accept the minor for temporary detention, the state facility shall notify the community services board, and an employee or designee of the community services board shall designate the alternative facility on the prescreening report.

The facility of temporary detention designated in accordance with this section shall be one that has been approved pursuant to regulations of the State Board of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services.

History.

2014, cc. 691, 773; 2015, cc. 121, 309.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2014, c. 691, cl. 4 and c. 773, cl. 2 provide: “That the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services shall submit an annual report on or before June 30 of each year on the implementation of this act to the Governor and the Chairmen of the House Appropriations and Senate Finance Committees. The report shall include the number of notifications of individuals in need of facility services by the community services boards, the number of alternative facilities contacted by community services boards and state facilities, the number of temporary detentions provided by state facilities and alternative facilities, the length of stay in state facilities and alternative facilities, and the cost of the detentions in state facilities and alternative facilities.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 121 and 309 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “released from custody” for “released from the custody of the community services board” in the second sentence.